Tennessee, session 114, HB1470.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 33, Chapter 1, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
33-1-205.
(a) A person who develops or deploys an artificial intelligence system shall not
advertise or represent to the public that such system is or is able to act as a qualified
mental health professional.
(b) A violation of subsection (a) constitutes a violation of the Tennessee
Consumer Protection Act of 1977, compiled in title 47, chapter 18, part 1. A violation of
subsection (a) constitutes an unfair or deceptive act or practice affecting trade or
commerce and is subject to the penalties and remedies provided in the Tennessee
Consumer Protection Act of 1977. Notwithstanding the civil penalty limits provided by
the Tennessee Consumer Protection Act of 1977, a violation of subsection (a) is subject
to a civil penalty of five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation.
(c) As used in this section, "artificial intelligence" means models and systems
capable of performing functions generally associated with human intelligence, including
reasoning and learning.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 47-18-104(b), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Violating § 33-1-205;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1470
009808
- 1 -